Massachusetts, session 194th, H1222.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any licensed health insurer
subject to the provisions of chapters 32A, 118E, 175, 176A, 176B or 176G of the General Laws
shall not request or require annual re-authorizations for any prescription drug as defined in
section 1 of chapter 94C of the General Laws that has been duly prescribed by a physician,
physician’s assistant or nurse practitioner to treat any chronic disease including, but not limited
to, diabetes, heart disease, Alzheimer's disease, cancer, stroke and respiratory disease
of 1